lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

! Part of Speech/Parte del discurso
+N  ! Noun/Sustantivo
    -POSS !unpossessed
    +POSS.1SN
    +POSS.1PL
    +POSS.2SN
    +POSS.2PL
    +POSS.3SN
    +POSS.3PL
    +SN
    +PL

+V  ! Verb/Verbo

+Det !determiner/determinante
    +Masc

+Conj !conjunction/conjunción

+Adv !adverb/adverbio

+Pro !pronouns/pronombres
    +1SN
    +1PL
    +2SN
    +2PL
    +3SN
    +3PL

+Int !interrogative

+Adj !adjetivos

! Possesive prefixes/prefijos posesivos
@U.POSS.1SN@ !Posesiva de primera persona singular
@U.POSS.2SN@ !Posesiva de segunda persona singular
@U.POSS.3SN@ !Posesiva de tercera persona singular
@U.POSS.1PL@ !Posesiva de primera persona plural
@U.POSS.2PL@ !Posesiva de segunda persona plural
@U.POSS.3PL@ !Posesiva de tercera persona plural
@U.POSS.NON@ !Unpossessed form/forma no poseída

!archiphonemes for possessive prefixes.
 %{POSS.1SN%}
 %{POSS.2SN%}
 %{POSS.3SN%}
 %{POSS.1PL%}
 %{POSS.2PL%}
 %{POSS.3PL%}


LEXICON Root
Verbs   ; !verbos
POSS_prefix  ; !prefijos 
Determiner ; !determinantes
Conjunction ; !conjunciones
Adverb ; !adverbios
Preposition ; !preposiciones
Pronoun ; !pronombres
Interrogative ;
Adjective ; !adjetivos
LEXICON Nouns
jolom     N ; !cabeza/head
kik'      N ; !sangre/blood
b'aq      N ; !hueso/bone
uuq       N ; !corte/tradicional fabric
tz'ultul  N ; !cerro/hill
tib'aaq   N ; !carne de cerdo/pork
uk'a'     N ; !bebida/drink
chahim    N ; !star/estrella
ch'o      N ; !mouse/ratón
ha'       N ; !water/agua
kenq'     N ; !bean/frijol
la        N ; !poison ivy/chichicaste
peepem    N ; !butterfly/mariposa
q'uq'     N ; !quetzal
saak'     N ; !grasshopper/saltamontes
tzuul     N ; !hill/cerro
tz'in     N ; !cassava/yuca
tenamit   N ; !town or country/pueblo o país
ch'och'   N ; !land/tierra
aatin     N ; !word/palabra
winq      N ; !man or person/hombre o persona
kutan     N ; !time/tiempo
ochoch    N ; !house/casa

LEXICON Verbs
!!!!FIXME -k is an optional suffix, verb roots do not include this, suffix becomes -q in future tense.
k'anjelak     V; !to work/trabajar
k'atok        V; !to burn/quemar
mesunk        V; !to sweep/barrer
wark          V; !to sleep/dormir
atink         V; !to bathe/bañarse
kamk          V; !to die/morir
b'eek         V; !to walk/caminar
xajok         V; !to dance/bailar

LEXICON V
# ;
LEXICON POSS_prefix
!Possessive Prefixes
@U.POSS.1SN@:@U.POSS.1SN@%{POSS.1SN%} Nouns ;
@U.POSS.2SN@:@U.POSS.2SN@%{POSS.2SN%} Nouns ;
@U.POSS.3SN@:@U.POSS.3SN@%{POSS.3SN%} Nouns ;
@U.POSS.1PL@:@U.POSS.1PL@%{POSS.1PL%} Nouns ; 
@U.POSS.2PL@:@U.POSS.2PL@%{POSS.2PL%} Nouns ;
@U.POSS.3PL@:@U.POSS.3PL@%{POSS.3PL%} Nouns ;
@U.POSS.NON@                          Nouns ;

LEXICON N
@U.POSS.NON@+N:@U.POSS.NON@ PL_suffix ;
@U.POSS.1SN@+N+POSS.1SN:@U.POSS.1SN@ PL_suffix ; 
@U.POSS.2SN@+N+POSS.2SN:@U.POSS.2SN@ PL_suffix ;
@U.POSS.3SN@+N+POSS.3SN:@U.POSS.3SN@ PL_suffix ;
@U.POSS.1PL@+N+POSS.1PL:@U.POSS.1PL@ PL_suffix ;
@U.POSS.2PL@+N+POSS.2PL:@U.POSS.2PL@ PL_suffix ;
@U.POSS.3PL@+N+POSS.3PL:@U.POSS.3PL@ POSS_suffix ;


LEXICON POSS_suffix
+SN:eb' #;
+PL:eb' #;

LEXICON PL_suffix
+SN:    #;
+PL:eb' #;
LEXICON Adjective
ink'a'+Adj:ink'a' # ;!no
yaal+Adj:yaal # ;!true/verdadero
xb'een+adj:xb'een # ;!first/primero
LEXICON Adverb
sa'+Adv:sa' # ; !in/en
chik+Adv:chik # ; !again/otra vez
LEXICON Conjunction
ut+Conj:ut # ; !and/y
LEXICON Determiner
li+Det:li # ; !the/el/la
laj+Det+Masc:laj # ; !marker for male people/indica personas masculinas
jun+Det:jun # ; !a/un/una
LEXICON Interrogative
jo'+int:jo' # ;!how?/como

LEXICON Preposition
re+Prep:re # ; !of/de
ru+Prep:ru # ; !from/de
chirix+Prep:chirix # ; !about/sobre
eb'+Prep:eb' # ; !FIXME synonymous with the suffix eb'
LEXICON Pronoun
laa'in+Pro+1SN:laa'in # ; !I/yo
a'an+Pro+3SN:a'an # ; !pronombre de tercera person singular
chixjunil+Pro:chixjunil #; !everything/todo
